Tennessee, session 114, HB1913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Regulatory Freedom Act of
2026."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-5-203(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Prominently publish the new or amended rule on its homepage during the
forty-five-day period prescribed in subsection (b); and
(B) Make a good faith effort to notify each trade association or organization
operating in this state that represents the regulated community and that may be
impacted by the new or amended rule at least forty-five (45) days prior to the public
hearing for which there is a period of public comment regarding the new or amended
rule. The notice must be sent by electronic mail and must include a copy of the new or
amended rule. The notice must request that the association or organization provide
comments during any such period of public comment, or provide such comments directly
to the agency, for the purpose of generating a fiscal impact statement, as defined in
SECTION 3(a).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "fiscal impact statement" means the estimate of the
actual cost of compliance of a new or amended rule based on its projected and collective
fiscal impact on the regulated industry, trade, business, or community, excluding
HB1913
010328
- 1 -

speculative, anti-competitive, or hypothetical costs, and the assumptions and reasoning
upon which the actual costs of compliance are based.
(b) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, an agency:
(1) Shall generate a fiscal impact statement for a new or amended rule
that is anticipated to have a negative fiscal effect on the regulated community,
including affected industries, businesses, and trades; and
(2) Shall not generate or create a fiscal impact statement for a new or
amended rule until after the public hearing with a period for public comment on
such rule to provide the public and affected industries, businesses, and trades
the opportunity to provide input with respect to the fiscal impact of such rule.
(c) In addition to other requirements under law, an agency:
(1) Shall include with each fiscal impact statement proof satisfactory that
the agency obtained feedback from representatives of industries, trades, and
businesses, including trade associations and organizations, or individual
businesses, from the regulated community, likely to be fiscally impacted by the
new or amended rule. This subdivision (c)(1) does not prohibit an individual or
business from submitting feedback to the agency anonymously regarding the
fiscal impact of the rule. "Proof satisfactory" under this subdivision (c)(1)
includes the name of each individual, association, and organization that provides
feedback to the agency for incorporation into a fiscal impact statement and the
industry, trade, or business that such individual represents unless feedback was
submitted anonymously by an individual or business, in which case the agency
shall notate the anonymous submission;
(2) May include, with each fiscal impact statement, feedback from
affected regulatory boards;
- 2 - 010328

(3) Shall include with each fiscal impact statement any information
related to the actual or potential negative fiscal impact of the new or amended
rule to an impacted industry, business, or trade shared during a period of public
comment, if such information was provided;
(4) Shall not separate one (1) or more proposed new or amended rules
for the purpose of segregating the fiscal impact statements with the intent to
bypass the monetary caps specified in § 4-5-226(c)(2) and (3); and
(5) If a fiscal impact statement exceeds the monetary cap specified in §
4-5-226(c)(3), the agency shall, as soon as practicable, provide written and
electronic notice, including the fiscal impact statement, to the governor, the
speakers of the senate and house of representatives, and the chairs of the joint
government operations committee that the monetary cap for a rule has been
exceeded. If notice is provided under this subdivision (c)(5) for an emergency
rule, the notice must state that the emergency rule will expire in accordance with
the time frames specified in § 4-5-208(f)(1)(B).
(d) Each agency shall compile an annual report aggregating the fiscal impact
statements generated for each new or amended rule that went into effect during the
immediately preceding year to illustrate the total and cumulative fiscal impact of rules
promulgated by each such agency.
(e) Each annual report must be:
(1) Filed and published in accordance with this subsection (e) no later
than January 31, 2027, and each January 31 thereafter; and
(2) Filed with:
(A) The speakers of the senate and house of representatives;
(B) The secretary of state; and
- 3 - 010328

(D) The chairs of the joint government operations committee of
the house of representatives and the senate.
(f) The secretary of state shall prominently publish on its homepage a link to
each annual report filed with the secretary of state under subsection (e).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-5-226, is amended by designating
subsection (c) as subdivision (c)(1) and adding the following new subdivisions (c)(2)-(4):
(2) Prior to or during the review of a rule by the joint government operations
committee meeting jointly under subdivision (c)(1), if the fiscal impact statement
generated for such rule indicates an estimated negative fiscal impact exceeding seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) over a five-year period, or exceeding seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) over a one-year period for an emergency rule,
either chair of the joint government operations committee may submit the rule and its
fiscal impact statement to the legislative director of the fiscal review committee for an
independent determination of the fiscal impact. The director of fiscal review shall review
and audit the fiscal impact of the rule and shall attach written findings of such review and
audit to the rule as an addendum for purposes of review by the joint government
operations committee. The director shall provide the fiscal impact addendum to the
chairs of the joint government operations committee and to the agency proposing the
rule upon completion of the addendum. The director shall complete such a review and
audit within the existing resources of the fiscal review committee.
(3) If the agency's fiscal impact statement of a rule, or the review and audit of a
rule conducted by the director of fiscal review under subdivision (c)(2), indicate that the
negative fiscal impact of the rule is estimated to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000)
over a five-year period, or over a one-year period for an emergency rule, as applicable,
and if the joint government operations committee approves such rule, then the rule only
- 4 - 010328

becomes effective upon approval by a majority vote of both the house of representatives
and the senate voting on the rule as a stand-alone legislative measure.
(4) As used in this subsection (c), "fiscal impact statement" has the same
meaning as defined in Section 3(a).
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, except as provided in
subsection (b), prior to the date on which a permanent rule expires in accordance with
this part, the agency that promulgated the rule may repeal the rule upon providing a
notice to repeal the rule to the secretary of state and the chairs of the joint government
operations committee. Upon receipt of the notice to repeal, the joint government
operations committee shall incorporate the rule to be repealed into the rule omnibus bill
that is transmitted to the floor of the senate and house of representatives for
consideration for the next regular or special legislative session, as applicable.
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to an agency rule that, based on the rule's
estimated fiscal impact, is anticipated to result in the loss of revenue to this state or a
local government of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) over a one-year period.
If the repeal of such rule is anticipated to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000), then
the rule may only expire or be repealed as otherwise provided in this part.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-5-208, is amended by adding the
following new subsection (f):
(1)
(A) An agency shall file a fiscal impact statement in accordance with
SECTION 3(a) and (b), with the secretary of state not later than forty-five (45)
days after an emergency rule goes into effect. The agency shall comply with
- 5 - 010328

SECTION 3(c) for purposes of generating the fiscal impact statement. If the
agency fails to file the fiscal impact statement pursuant to this subdivision (f)(1),
the emergency rule ceases to be effective the day after such forty-five-day filing
period expires.
(B) Notwithstanding this section, if the fiscal impact statement of an
emergency rule has an anticipated negative fiscal impact in excess of one million
dollars ($1,000,000) over a one-year period, the emergency rule expires upon
the earlier of the following:
(i) One hundred eighty (180) days after becoming effective;
(ii) Upon the adjournment of the next special session convened
by the general assembly for any reason; or
(iii) The fourteenth calendar day of the next regular legislative
session of the general assembly.
(2) If the general assembly is convened in a special or regular legislative
session, the general assembly may approve an emergency rule that would otherwise
expire under subdivision (f)(1)(B) by adopting the rule by a majority vote of both the
house of representatives and the senate.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 6 - 010328